Vermont, session 2025-2026, H773.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5252 is amended to read:
§ 5252. LEVY AND NOTICE OF SALE; SECURING PROPERTY
(a)(1) When the collector of taxes of a town or of a municipality within it
has for collection a tax assessed against real estate in the town and the taxpayer
owes a minimum of $1,500.00 and is delinquent for a period longer than one
year, the collector may extend a warrant on such land. However, no warrant
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 2 of 8
shall be extended until a delinquent taxpayer is given an opportunity to enter a
written reasonable repayment plan pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. If
a collector receives notice from a mobile home park owner pursuant to
10 V.S.A. § 6248(b), the collector shall, within 15 days after the notice,
commence tax sale proceedings to hold a tax sale within 60 days after the
notice. If the collector fails to initiate such proceedings, the town may initiate
tax sale proceedings only after complying with 10 V.S.A. § 6249(f). If the tax
collector extends the warrant, the collector shall:
(1)(A) File in the office of the town clerk for record a true and
attested copy of the warrant and so much of the tax bill committed to the
collector for collection as relates to the tax against the delinquent taxpayer, a
sufficient description of the land so levied upon, and a statement in writing that
by virtue of the original tax warrant and tax bill committed to the collector for
collection, the collector has levied upon the described land.
(2)(B) Advertise forthwith such land for sale at public auction in the
town where it lies three weeks successively in a newspaper circulating in the
vicinity, the last publication to be at least 10 days before such sale.
(3)(C) Give the delinquent taxpayer written notice by certified mail
requiring a return receipt directed to the last known address of the delinquent
of the date and place of such sale at least 30 days prior thereto if the delinquent
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 3 of 8
is a resident of the town and 30 days prior thereto if the delinquent is a
nonresident of the town. If the notice by certified mail is returned unclaimed:
(A)(i) notice shall be provided to the taxpayer by resending the
notice by first-class mail or by personal service pursuant to Rule 4 of the
Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(B)(ii) notice shall be provided by email, provided the tax
collector can acquire the email address of the delinquent taxpayer using
reasonable effort; and
(C)(iii) notice shall be affixed to the front door of the property
subject to tax sale, provided it has a structure.
(4)(D) Give to the mortgagee or lien holder of record written notice
of such sale at least 30 days prior thereto if a resident of the town and, if a
nonresident, 30 days’ notice to the mortgagee or lien holder of record or the
mortgagee’s or lien holder’s agent or attorney by certified mail requiring a
return receipt directed to the last known address of such person. If the notice
by certified mail is returned unclaimed, notice shall be provided by resending
the notice by first-class mail or by personal service pursuant to Rule 4 of the
Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(5)(E) Post a notice of such sale in some public place in the town.
(6)(F) Enclose the following statement, with directions to a resource
translating the notice into the five most common non-English languages used
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 4 of 8
in this State, with the notices required under subdivisions (3)(C) and (4)(D) of
this subsection subdivision (a)(1) and with every delinquent tax notice:
Warning: There are unpaid property taxes at (address of property), which you
may own, or have a legal interest, in or which may be contiguous to your
property. The property will be sold at public auction on (date set for sale)
unless the overdue taxes, fees, and interest in the amount of (dollar amount
due) is are paid. To make payment or receive further information, contact
(name of tax collector) immediately at (office address), (mailing address),
(email address), or (telephone number).
(7)(G) The resource for translation of the notice required under
subdivision (6)(F) of this subsection subdivision (a)(1) shall be made available
to all municipalities by the Vermont Department of Taxes.
(2)(A) A municipality may seek an order in the Civil Division of the
Superior Court that a property has been abandoned and the dwelling on the
property is unfit for human habitation.
(B) The complaint shall include:
(i) the name and last known mailing address of the owner of the
real property;
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 5 of 8
(ii) the location and description of the real property;
(iii) the facts supporting the claim that the real property has been
abandoned and the facts supporting the claim that the real property is unfit for
human habitation;
(iv) the names and addresses of creditors, holders of housing
subsidy covenants, or others having an interest in the real property based on
liens or notices recorded in the land records in the office of the town clerk of
the town in which the real property is located or the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(v) a statement of the amount of delinquent taxes due to the
municipality, including penalties and interest owed.
(C) When a complaint is filed under this subdivision (a)(2), the clerk
of the Superior Court shall set a hearing on the complaint before a Superior
judge. The hearing shall be held at least 15 days but not later than 30 days
after the filing of the complaint.
(D) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection (a), when a
municipality receives an order under this subdivision (a)(2), a municipality
may proceed with a tax sale of the real property subject to the order regardless
of whether the property has met the minimum of $1,500.00 in delinquent taxes.
The municipality shall proceed with the tax sale as outlined in subdivision (1)
of this subsection (a).
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 6 of 8
(b)(1) If the warrant and levy for delinquent taxes has been recorded
pursuant to subsection subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the municipality in
which the real estate lies may secure the property against illegal activity and
potential fire hazards after giving the mortgagee or lien holder of record
written notice at least 10 days prior to such action.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, when a
warrant and levy for delinquent taxes has been recorded pursuant to subsection
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, it shall be for all delinquent taxes due at the
time the warrant and levy is filed.
(c)(1) A municipality shall not initiate a tax sale proceeding until it has,
after attempting to consult with the taxpayer, offered a delinquent taxpayer a
written reasonable repayment plan and the taxpayer has either denied the offer,
failed to respond within 30 days, or failed to make a payment under the plan
within the time frame established by the collector. When establishing a plan
under this subsection, the municipality may request related information and
shall consider the following:
(A) the income and income schedule of the taxpayer, if offered by the
taxpayer;
(B) the taxpayer’s tax payment history with the municipality;
(C) the amount of tax debt owed to the municipality;
(D) the amount of time tax has been delinquent; and
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 7 of 8
(E) the taxpayer’s reason for the delinquency, if offered by the
taxpayer.
(2) A collector is only required to offer one payment plan per
delinquency, without regard for whether it is agreed to by the delinquent
taxpayer.
(3) A collector may void a payment plan and proceed to tax sale if a
delinquent taxpayer agrees to a payment plan under this subsection and fails to
make a timely payment.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5258 is amended to read:
§ 5258. FEES AND COSTS ALLOWED AFTER WARRANT AND LEVY
RECORDED
(a) The fees and costs allowed after the warrant and levy for delinquent
taxes have been recorded shall be as follows:
(1) levy and extending of warrant, $10.00;
(2) recording levy and extending of warrant in the town clerk’s office,
$15.00, to be paid to the town clerk;
(3) notices and publication of notices, actual costs incurred, including
the costs of service pursuant to subdivisions 5252(a)(3)(1)(C) and (4)(D) of
this title;
(4) expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the town in securing a
property for which property taxes are delinquent against illegal activity and fire
VT LEG #386409 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.773
2026 Page 8 of 8
hazards, to be paid to the town clerk, provided that the expenses shall not
exceed 20 percent of the uncollected tax;
(5) when authorized by the selectboard, expenses actually and
reasonably incurred by the tax collector for legal assistance in the preparation
for or conduct of a tax sale, provided that the expenses shall not exceed 15
percent of the uncollected tax;
(6) travel reimbursement at the rate established by the contract
governing State employees;
(7) attending and holding the sale, $10.00;
(8) making return and recording the return in the town clerk’s office,
$15.00 per page, to be paid to the town clerk; and
(9) collector’s deed, $15.00 per page.
(b) The fees and costs allowed in subsection (a) of this section, together
with a collector’s fee of up to eight percent, shall be in lieu of all other fees and
costs.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386409 v.2